Hawaii statutes.
[§98-5] Authentication of official
electronic record. An official publisher of legal material in an
electronic record that is designated as official under section 98-4 shall
authenticate the record. To authenticate an electronic record, the publisher shall
provide a method for a user to determine that the record received by the user
from the publisher is unaltered from the official record published by the
publisher. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next